test/src/morphology/N-igae33_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - igä: # Noun (33) igä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     igä+N+Sg+Nom: igä
     igä+N+Sg+Gen: iä
     igä+N+Sg+Par: ikä
     igä+N+Sg+Ill: ikkä
     igä+N+Pl+Gen: iki
     igä+N+Pl+Par: iki
     igä+N+Pl+Ill: [ikkihe, ikki]
     igä+N+Pl+All: ikile
